Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1475.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28A.405.415 and 2023 c 379 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Certificated instructional staff who have attained certification from the national board for professional teaching standards shall receive a bonus each year in which they maintain the certification. The bonus shall be calculated as follows: The annual bonus shall be $5,000 in the 2007-08 school year. Thereafter, the annual bonus shall increase by inflation, except that the bonus shall not be increased during the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years.(2)(a) Certificated instructional staff who have attained certification from the national board for professional teaching standards shall be eligible for bonuses in addition to that provided by subsection (1) of this section if the individual is in an instructional assignment in a school in which at least 70 percent of the students qualify for the free and reduced-price lunch program.(b) An individual is eligible for bonuses authorized under this subsection (2) if he or she is in an instructional assignment in a school that meets the definition of high poverty school as defined in rule by the office of the superintendent of public instruction in the school year immediately preceding the school's participation in the United States department of agriculture's community eligibility provision.(c) For the 2024-25 and 2025-26 school years, individuals are eligible for bonuses under this subsection if they are in an instructional assignment in a school providing meals at no charge to students under RCW 28A.235.135 that met the definition of high poverty school as defined in rule by the office of the superintendent of public instruction during the 2022-23 school year.(3) The amount of the additional bonus under subsection (2) of this section for those meeting the qualifications of subsection (2) of this section is $5,000.(4) The bonuses provided under this section are in addition to compensation received under a district's salary schedule adopted in accordance with RCW 28A.405.200 and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary limitations under RCW 28A.400.200.(5) The bonuses provided under this section shall be paid in a lump sum amount.(6) Notwithstanding the requirements in this section, no bonus may be paid for the 2025-26, 2026-27, 2027-28, or 2028-29 school years.--- END ---